Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-825
Wildfire Control Act of 2013; act,
how cited.

Sections
81-825 to 81-828 shall be known and may be cited as the Wildfire Control Act
of 2013.

Laws 2013, LB634, § 1.